Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF79.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [62Q.59] PROVIDER REIMBURSEMENT EQUITY. new text end new text begin If an enrollee chooses to receive a covered service from a licensed and certified advanced practice nurse practitioner or a licensed physician assistant, the health plan company must reimburse the advanced practice registered nurse or physician assistant at the same rate as a licensed physician for providing the same service. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective January 1, 2025, and applies to any covered service provided on or after that date. new text end